Utah statutes.
61-2b-36.   Contingent fees.
(1)  A person licensed or certified under this chapter who enters into an
agreement to perform an appraisal may not accept a contingent fee.
(2)  A person licensed or certified under this chapter who enters into an
agreement to provide consultation services may be paid a fixed fee or a
contingent fee.
(3) (a)  If a person licensed or certified under this chapter enters into an
agreement to perform consultation services for a contingent fee, this fact
shall be clearly stated in each oral statement.
(b)  In addition to the requirements of Subsection (3)(a), if a person
licensed or certified under this chapter prepares a written consultation
report or summary, letter of transmittal, or certification statement for a
contingent fee, the person shall clearly state in the report, summary, letter
of transmittal, or certification statement that the report is prepared under a
contingent fee arrangement.
